Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-341
Noncontracting reciprocity jurisdiction, defined.

Noncontracting reciprocity jurisdiction means any jurisdiction which is not a party to any type of contracting agreement between the State of Nebraska and one or more other jurisdictions for registration purposes on commercial motor vehicles or trailers and, as a condition to operate on the highways of that jurisdiction, (1) does not require any type of motor vehicle or trailer registration or allocation of motor vehicles or trailers for registration purposes or (2) does not impose any charges based on miles operated, other than those that might be assessed against fuel consumed in that jurisdiction, on any motor vehicles or trailers which are part of a Nebraska-based fleet.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 41.